South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Amateur Radio Antenna Protection Act." SECTION 2.  (A) The General Assembly finds that: (1) Amateur radio is a vital public service that provides emergency communications during times of disaster and provides a critical link to isolated communities. (2) Amateur radio operators play a vital role in disaster relief and emergency preparedness efforts. (3) Amateur radio is a valuable hobby and educational tool that promotes science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education. (B) The purpose of this act is to protect the right of amateur radio operators to install and use antennas on their property. SECTION 3.  Chapter 1, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-1-190. A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that fails to conform to the Amateur Radio Preemption issued by the Federal Communications Commission. An ordinance adopted by a county with respect to amateur radio antennas must conform to the Amateur Radio Preemption which states that local ordinances that involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate amateur communications and to represent the minimum practicable regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----